District of Columbia statutes.
46-420

Confidential character of blood test information.

Any information obtained from any laboratory blood test required under § 46-417 [repealed] shall be regarded as confidential by each person, agency, or committee who obtains, transmits, or receives such information.

History

Oct. 15, 1966, 80 Stat. 960, Pub. L. 89-682, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-120.
1973 Ed., § 30-122.